New York, session 2025-2026, A58.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph h of subdivision 2 of section 2 355 of the education law, as separately amended by chapters 552 and 616 3 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other general, special or 5 local law, rule or regulation, such regulations may permit persons sixty 6 years of age or over to audit courses given therein without tuition, 7 examination, grading or credit therefor upon a space available basis, as 8 determined by the president of each such institution, provided that such 9 audit attendance does not deny course attendance at a state-operated 10 institution by an individual who is otherwise qualified under the regu- 11 lations promulgated pursuant to this section. For purposes of this 12 section, persons sixty-five years of age or over who are residents of 13 the state shall be eligible to take not more than nine credit hours of 14 courses for credit per semester without tuition. 15 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 7 of section 6206 of the education 16 law, as added by chapter 344 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other general, special or 19 local law, rule or regulation, the board of trustees may permit persons 20 sixty years of age or over to audit courses given therein without 21 tuition, examination, grading or credit therefor upon a space available 22 basis, as determined by the president of each such institution, provided EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00436-01-5 A. 58 2 1 that such audit attendance does not deny course attendance at the city 2 university of New York by an individual who is otherwise qualified under 3 this section. For purposes of this section, persons sixty-five years of 4 age or over who are residents of the state shall be eligible to take not 5 more than nine credit hours of courses for credit per semester without 6 tuition. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 8 the date on which it shall have become a law.